kmr/kmr-Latn.aff
SFX I Y 52
SFX I 0 im [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ime [^aîû]
SFX I 0 î [^aîû]
SFX I 0 îye [^aîû]
SFX I 0 in [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibûm [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibûma [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibûyî [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibûye [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibûya [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibû [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibûn [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibûna [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibim [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibî [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibe [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ibin [^aîû]
SFX I 0 iban [^aîû]
SFX I 0 iye [^aîû]
SFX I 0 ine [^aîû]
SFX I 0 m [aîû]
SFX I 0 yî [aû]
SFX I 0 ye [aû]
SFX I 0 n [aîû]
SFX I 0 me [aîû]
SFX I 0 yine [aû]
SFX I 0 ne [aîû]
SFX I 0 bûm [aîû]
SFX I 0 bûma [aîû]
SFX I 0 bûyî [aîû]
SFX I 0 bûya [aîû]
SFX I 0 bû [aîû]
SFX I 0 bûn [aîû]
SFX I 0 bûna [aîû]
SFX I 0 bûye [aîû]
SFX I 0 bûne [aîû]
SFX I 0 bim [aîû]
SFX I 0 bî [aîû]
SFX I 0 be [aîû]
SFX I 0 bin [aîû]
SFX I 0 ban [aîû]
SFX I î yî î
SFX I î ye î
SFX I î yine î
SFX I 0 ma [aeêiîouû]
SFX I 0 ya [aeêiîouû]
SFX I 0 ama [^aeêiîouû]
SFX I 0 ayî [^aeêiîouû]
SFX I 0 a [^aeêiîouû]
SFX I 0 ana [^aeêiîouû]
SFX I 0 e [^aeêiîouû]
SFX I 0 ê [^aeêiîouû]

PFX T Y 48
PFX T 0 di [^aê]
PFX T 0 d [aê]
PFX T 0 na .
PFX T 0 bi .
PFX T 0 ne .
PFX T 0 nedi .
PFX T 0 hil .
PFX T 0 hildi [^aê]
PFX T 0 hild [aê]
PFX T 0 hilna .
PFX T 0 hilbi .
PFX T 0 hilne .
PFX T 0 hilnedi .
PFX T 0 ve .
PFX T 0 vedi [^aê]
PFX T 0 ved [aê]
PFX T 0 vebi .
PFX T 0 vena .
PFX T 0 vene .
PFX T 0 venedi .
PFX T 0 rû .
PFX T 0 rûdi [^aê]
PFX T 0 rûd [aê]
PFX T 0 rûbi .
PFX T 0 rûna .
PFX T 0 rûne .
PFX T 0 rûnedi .
PFX T 0 da .
PFX T 0 dadi [^aê]
PFX T 0 dad [aê]
PFX T 0 dabi .
PFX T 0 dana .
PFX T 0 dane .
PFX T 0 danedi .
PFX T 0 der .
PFX T 0 derdi [^aê]
PFX T 0 derd [aê]
PFX T 0 derbi .
PFX T 0 derna .
PFX T 0 derne .
PFX T 0 dernedi .
PFX T 0 ber .
PFX T 0 berdi [^aê]
PFX T 0 berd [aê]
PFX T 0 berbi .
PFX T 0 berna .
PFX T 0 berne .
PFX T 0 bernedi .

SFX T Y 52
SFX T 0 im [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ime [^aîû]
SFX T 0 î [^aîû]
SFX T 0 îye [^aîû]
SFX T 0 in [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibûm [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibûma [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibûyî [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibûye [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibûya [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibû [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibûn [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibûna [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibim [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibî [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibe [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ibin [^aîû]
SFX T 0 iban [^aîû]
SFX T 0 iye [^aîû]
SFX T 0 ine [^aîû]
SFX T 0 m [aîû]
SFX T 0 yî [aû]
SFX T 0 ye [aû]
SFX T 0 n [aîû]
SFX T 0 me [aîû]
SFX T 0 yine [aû]
SFX T 0 ne [aîû]
SFX T 0 bûm [aîû]
SFX T 0 bûma [aîû]
SFX T 0 bûyî [aîû]
SFX T 0 bûya [aîû]
SFX T 0 bû [aîû]
SFX T 0 bûn [aîû]
SFX T 0 bûna [aîû]
SFX T 0 bûye [aîû]
SFX T 0 bûne [aîû]
SFX T 0 bim [aîû]
SFX T 0 bî [aîû]
SFX T 0 be [aîû]
SFX T 0 bin [aîû]
SFX T 0 ban [aîû]
SFX T î yî î
SFX T î ye î
SFX T î yine î
SFX T 0 ma [aeêiîouû]
SFX T 0 ya [aeêiîouû]
SFX T 0 ama [^aeêiîouû]
SFX T 0 ayî [^aeêiîouû]
SFX T 0 a [^aeêiîouû]
SFX T 0 ana [^aeêiîouû]
SFX T 0 e [^aeêiîouû]
SFX T 0 ê [^aeêiîouû]

#######################################################################
# END OF MORPHOLOGICAL RULES FOR NOUNS, VERBS, ADJECTIVES AND ADVERBS
#######################################################################
###### Numerals

SFX E Y 2
SFX E 0 em
SFX E 0 emîn

PFX X Y 1
PFX X 0 ne

# END OF AFF FILE
# =======================================================================================
# Copyright 2022 Sina Ahmadi <ahmadi.sina@outlook.com> <sinaahmadi.github.io/>
# =======================================================================================
