kmr/kmr-Latn.dic
anî/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:an lem:anîn
axivî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:axiv lem:axivîn
barand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:bar lem:barandin
bawerandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:bawer lem:bawerandin
bawişkî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:bawişk lem:bawişkîn
bijand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:bij lem:bijandin
bijî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:bij lem:bijîn
bizivand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:biziv lem:bizivandin
bişirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:bişir lem:bişirîn
bişirîn/XF po:verb is:infinitive_intransitive_active st:bişir lem:bişirîn
bîstûneh/E po:num st:bîst
bîstûçar/E po:num st:bîst
camisî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:camis lem:camisîn
cehimand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:cehim lem:cehimandin
civirand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:civir lem:civirandin
civî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:civ lem:civîn
dan/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:d lem:dan
dazdeh/E po:num st:da
dehûyek/E po:num st:deh
deqand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:deq lem:deqandin
diwanzde/E po:num st:diwan
donze/E po:num st:don
dudeh/E po:num st:dudeh
duwanzde/E po:num st:duwan
eciband/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:ecib lem:ecibandin
eciqî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:eciq lem:eciqîn
elimandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:elim lem:elimandin
farisand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:faris lem:farisandin
fetilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:fetil lem:fetilîn
firdikî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:firdik lem:firdikîn
firîn/XF po:verb is:infinitive_intransitive_active st:fir lem:firîn
fitilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:fitil lem:fitilîn
fîkand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:fîk lem:fîkandin
gerî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:ger lem:gerîn
girî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:gir lem:girîn
gonand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:gon lem:gonandin
guherîn/XF po:verb is:infinitive_intransitive_active st:guher lem:guherîn
hat/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:hat lem:hatin
heft/E po:num st:heft
heftêûdu/E po:num st:heftê
heftêûpênc/E po:num st:heftê
heftêûşeş/E po:num st:heftê
helpesatin/XF po:verb
helî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:hel lem:helîn
herikand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:herik lem:herikandin
hetikî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:hetik lem:hetikîn
hevdeh/E po:num st:hevdeh
hewilandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:hewil lem:hewilandin
heşand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:heş lem:heşandin
heştêûdu/E po:num st:heştê
heştêûpênc/E po:num st:heştê
heştêûşeş/E po:num st:heştê
hinandin/XF po:verb
huvde/E po:num st:huv
hûnandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:hûn lem:hûnandin
jimart/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:jimar lem:hejmartin
kenandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:ken lem:kenandin
kenî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:ken lem:kenîn
kerrixî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:kerrix lem:kerrixîn
kiland/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:kil lem:kilandin
kolîn/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:kol lem:kolîn
kurdand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:kurd lem:kurdandin
lebitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:lebit lem:lebitîn
lewitandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:lewit lem:lewitandin
lipitî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:lipit lem:lipitîn
loqand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:loq lem:loqandin
lîst/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:lîst lem:lîstin
maltin/XF po:verb
milyar/E po:num st:milyar
minminand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:minm lem:minminandin
mir/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:mir lem:mirin
mizicandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:mizic lem:mizicandin
nehwet/E po:num st:nehwet
nermijand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:nermij lem:nermijandin
nevêtin/XF po:verb
niçand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:niç lem:niçandin
notûdu/E po:num st:not
notûpênc/E po:num st:not
notûşeş/E po:num st:not
nûhirandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:nûhir lem:nûhirandin
panzdeh/E po:num st:pan
pelixî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:pelix lem:pelixîn
pengand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:peng lem:pengandin
perçiqandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:perçiq lem:perçiqandin
perçiqî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:perçiq lem:perçiqîn
peşkand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:peşk lem:peşkandin
piçandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:piç lem:piçandin
pênce/E po:num st:pênc
pêncî/E po:num st:pênc
pêncîûneh/E po:num st:pênc
pîpikand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:pîpik lem:pîpikandin
qefilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qefil lem:qefilîn
qehirîn/XF po:verb is:infinitive_intransitive_active st:qehir lem:qehirîn
qelipî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qelip lem:qelipîn
qerimand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:qerim lem:qerimandin
qewirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qewir lem:qewirîn
qirçandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:qirç lem:qirçandin
qutifand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:qutif lem:qutifandin
qutifî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:qutif lem:qutifîn
recifîn/XF po:verb
reşand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:reş lem:reşandin
rihilî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:rihil lem:rihilîn
rizandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:riz lem:rizandin
sanî/E po:num st:sanî
sediqand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:sediq lem:sediqandin
sedûdu/E po:num st:sed
sedûçar/E po:num st:sed
seqimîn/XF po:verb
sincirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:sincir lem:sincirîn
sirand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:sir lem:sirandin
sî/E po:num st:sî
sîûsê/E po:num st:sî
sûrandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:sûr lem:sûrandin
tepand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:tep lem:tepandin
tewandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:tew lem:tewandin
vegemirandin/XF po:verb
veserand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:veser lem:veserandin
vîn/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:v lem:vîn
werimî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:werim lem:werimîn
xelî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:xel lem:xelîn
xemiland/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:xemil lem:xemilandin
xemilîn/XF po:verb is:infinitive_intransitive_active st:xemil lem:xemilîn
xufirandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:xufir lem:xufirandin
xurand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:xur lem:xurandin
yazde/E po:num st:ya
zeliqî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:zeliq lem:zeliqîn
zewicî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:zewic lem:zewicîn
zeximandin/XF po:verb
zirviçand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:zirviç lem:zirviçandin
zivirî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:zivir lem:zivirîn
çarem/E po:num st:çarem
çendemîn/XF po:verb
çerî/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:çer lem:çerîn
çilûsê/E po:num st:çil
çixandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:çix lem:çixandin
çêjand/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:çêj lem:çêjandin
çû/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:çû lem:çûn
şazde/E po:num st:şa
şepilandin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:şepil lem:şepilandin
şeqizî/I po:verb is:past_stem_intransitive_active st:şeqiz lem:şeqizîn
şiband/T po:verb is:past_stem_transitive_active st:şib lem:şibandin
şêstûneh/E po:num st:şêst
şûştin/XF po:verb is:infinitive_transitive_active st:şûşt lem:şûştin
